Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 8 Sentences

38-2-1055.
Cruel and unusual punishments prohibited.

Punishment by flogging or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body or any other cruel or unusual punishment shall not be adjudged by a court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this article. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1055

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Cruel and unusual punishment, U.S. Const., amend. 8 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XIV.

Prohibition against whipping as punishment for crime, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVIII.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 855

.

38-2-1056.
Maximum sentencing limits.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense shall not exceed such limits as prescribed by this article, but in no instance shall a sentence exceed more than ten years nor shall a sentence of death be adjudged. A conviction by general court-martial of any offense for which an accused may receive a sentence of confinement for more than one year shall be a felony offense. Except for convictions by a summary court-martial, all other convictions shall be misdemeanors. Any conviction by a summary court-martial shall not be a criminal conviction.

The limits of punishment for violations of this article prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be the lesser of the sentences prescribed by the manual for courts-martial of the United States in effect on January 1, 2015, if such manual contains the offense, and any regulations or manual for courts-martial adopted in this state pursuant to Code Section 38-2-1036, but in no instance shall any punishment exceed that authorized by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1056

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 38/HB 323.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 856

.

38-2-1057.
Effective date of sentences.

Whenever a sentence of a court-martial as lawfully adjudged and approved includes a forfeiture of pay or allowances in addition to confinement not suspended, the forfeiture shall apply to pay or allowances becoming due on or after the date the sentence is approved by the convening authority. No forfeiture shall extend to any pay or allowances accrued before that date.

Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial shall begin to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended or deferred shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement.

All sentences of courts-martial, except as provided for by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, shall be effective on the date ordered executed.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1057

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 857

.

38-2-1057.1.
Deferment of sentence.

On application by an accused who is under sentence to confinement that has not been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under that person’s jurisdiction, the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned may, in that person’s sole discretion, defer service of the sentence to confinement. Such deferment shall terminate when the sentence is ordered executed. Such deferment may be rescinded at any time by the person who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under that person’s jurisdiction, by the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

In any case in which a court-martial sentences an accused as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection to confinement, the convening authority shall defer the service of the sentence to confinement, without the consent of the accused, until after the accused has been permanently released to the organized militia by another state, the United States, or a foreign country referred to in that paragraph.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall apply to a person subject to this article who:

While in the custody of another state, the United States, or a foreign country is temporarily returned by such state, the United States, or a foreign country to the organized militia for trial by court-martial; and

After the court-martial, is returned to such state, the United States, or a foreign country under the authority of a mutual agreement or treaty, as the case may be.

In any case in which a court-martial sentences an accused to confinement and the sentence to confinement has been ordered executed, but in which review of the case under Code Section 38-2-1067 is pending, the adjutant general may defer further service of the sentence to confinement while that review is pending.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1057.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1058.
Execution of confinement; discipline while in civil jails; hard labor; civil confinement according to law.

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a court-martial, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, shall be carried into execution by confinement in any place authorized by this article. Persons so confined shall be subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons regularly confined or committed to that place of confinement.

The omission of hard labor as a sentence authorized under this article shall not deprive a confinement facility from employing it, if it otherwise is within the authority of that facility to do so.

No place of confinement shall require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving or confining a person except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1058

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Conditions of detention of prison inmates generally, §

42-5-50

et seq.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 858

.

38-2-1058.1.
Reduction of pay grade.

A court-martial sentence of an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-1, as approved by the convening authority, that includes a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge or confinement shall reduce that member to pay grade E-1, effective on the date of that approval.

If the sentence of an enlisted member who is reduced in pay grade under subsection (a) of this Code section is set aside or disapproved, or, as finally approved, does not include any punishment named in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the rights and privileges of which the person was deprived because of that reduction shall be restored, including, but not limited to, pay and allowances.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1058.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1058.2.
Forfeiture of pay and allowances.

A court-martial sentence as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall result in the forfeiture of pay, or of pay and allowances, due that member during any period of confinement or parole. Such forfeiture pursuant to this Code section shall take effect on the date determined under Code Section 38-2-1057 and may be deferred as provided by that Code section. The pay and allowances forfeited shall be all pay and allowances due that member during such period.

A sentence covered by this subsection shall be any sentence that includes:

Confinement for more than six months; or

Confinement for six months or less and a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge or dismissal.

In a case involving an accused who has dependents, the convening authority or other person acting under Code Section 38-2-1060 may waive any or all of the forfeitures of pay and allowances required by subsection (a) of this Code section for a period not to exceed six months. Any amount of pay or allowances that, except for a waiver under this subsection, would be forfeited shall be paid, as the convening authority or other person taking action directs, to the dependents of the accused.

If the sentence of a member who forfeits pay and allowances under subsection (a) of this Code section is set aside or disapproved or, as finally approved, does not provide for a punishment referred to in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the member shall be paid the pay and allowances which the member would have been paid, except for the forfeiture, for the period during which the forfeiture was in effect.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1058.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.